Wyoming, session 2025, SF0099.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xxxvi) and
39-13-103(b)(xii)(A)(intro) and (I) are amended to read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.
SF0099

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0056

(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:

(xxxvi) Real property owned by the Wyoming game
and fish commission. Nothing in this exemption affects
except for real property that is used for wildlife
management purposes and assessed based upon the taxable
value of agricultural land pursuant to the special tax
levied under W.S. 39-13-103(b)(xii);

39-13-103. Imposition.

(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

(xii) The following shall apply to special tax
imposed on property owned by the game and fish commission:

(A) There is imposed upon all real property
owned by the Wyoming game and fish commission and used for
wildlife management purposes a special tax computed as
provided in this paragraph which shall be in lieu of ad
SF0099

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0056
valorem property tax. The special tax shall be determined
as follows:

(I) For property used for wildlife
management purposes, The tax shall be equal to the amount
of the ad valorem tax for that property had it been levied
and assessed based upon the taxable value of agricultural
land of similar productive value under W.S. 39-13-101(a)
and paragraph (b)(x) of this section;

Section 2. W.S. 39-13-103(b)(xii)(A)(II) is repealed.

Section 3. Nothing in this act shall be deemed to
affect any tax assessment or collection before January 1,
2026.

Section 4. This act is effective January 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0099